Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB610.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XXIV-C heading and sections 2401-C, 2402-12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 C, 2403-C, 2404-C, 2405-C, 2406-C heading and (a), 2407-C(a), 2408-C and 2409-C of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, are amended to read:ARTICLE XXIV-CPUBLIC [WORKS] CONTRACTOR EMPLOYMENT VERIFICATIONSection 2401-C. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Contract." A type of written agreement, between a public body and a public contractor, regardless of what the agreement may be called, for the procurement or disposal of supplies, services or construction and executed by all parties in accordance with all applicable State law."Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Employee." An individual hired by a public [works] contractor or subcontractor for whom the public [works] contractor or subcontractor is required by law to file a Form W-2 with the Internal Revenue Service."EVP." The E-Verify Program operated by the Department of Homeland Security that electronically verifies employment eligibility for employees."Public body." The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, any of its political subdivisions, any authority created by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth and any instrumentality or agency of the Commonwealth.["Public work." As defined under section 2 of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.]20250HB0610PN0623 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Public [works] contractor." A contractor that provides work under a contract [involving a public work] with a public body."Secretary." The Secretary of General Services of the Commonwealth."Subcontractor." A person, other than a natural person, regardless of its tier, including, but not limited to, a staffing agency that performs work for a public [works] contractor under a contract [for a public work]. The term shall not include persons that are material suppliers for a construction project."Willful." Action or conduct undertaken intentionally or with reckless disregard for or deliberate ignorance of the requirements and obligations established under this article.Section 2402-C. Duty of public [works] contractors and subcontractors.(a) General rule.--[A](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a public [works] contractor or subcontractor shall participate in EVP and shall, subject to the requirements of Federal law governing the use of EVP, use EVP to verify employment eligibility of each new employee. The department shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website information regarding the requirements of Federal law governing the use of EVP.(2) A public contractor or subcontractor without employees shall not be required to enroll in EVP. The following shall apply:(i) For the purposes of section 2403-C, a public contractor or subcontractor without employees may submit an affidavit stating that the individual public 20250HB0610PN0623 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contractor or subcontractor is authorized to work in the United States and has no employees, in lieu of a statement that the public contractor or subcontractor is enrolled in EVP.(ii) A public contractor or subcontractor without employees shall enroll in EVP and provide an updated verification form to the public body prior to hiring any employees.(b) Discrimination prohibited.--In conducting the verification required by this section, a public [works] contractor or subcontractor shall not discriminate against an employee on the basis of race, ethnicity, color or national origin.Section 2403-C. Verification form.(a) General rule for public [works] contractors.--As a precondition of being awarded a contract [for a public work], or with respect to a contract that was awarded prior to the effective date of this subsection but has not yet been executed, prior to the execution of the contract, a public [works] contractor shall provide the public body with a verification form described in subsection (c), acknowledging its responsibilities under and its compliance with section 2402-C and stating that the contractor is enrolled in EVP. Contracts between a public [works] contractor and its subcontractors shall contain information about the requirements of this article.(b) General rule for subcontractors.--Prior to commencing work [on a public works project] under a contract, a subcontractor shall provide the public body with a verification form described in subsection (c) acknowledging its responsibilities and its compliance with section 2402-C and 20250HB0610PN0623 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stating that the subcontractor is enrolled in EVP. Contracts between a subcontractor and its subcontractors shall contain information about the requirements of this article.(c) Form.--The verification form required by this section shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary and posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall comply with the following additional requirements:(1) The statement shall include a certification that the information in the statement is true and correct and that the individual signing the statement understands that the submission of false or misleading information in connection with the verification shall subject the individual and the public [works] contractor or subcontractor, as the case may be, to sanctions provided by law.(2) The statement shall be signed by a representative of the public [works] contractor or subcontractor, as applicable, who has sufficient knowledge and authority to make the representations and certifications contained in the statement.Section 2404-C. Violations.It is a violation of this article for a public [works] contractor or subcontractor [on a public work] under a contract to:(1) Fail to verify the employment eligibility of a new employee through EVP in accordance with Federal law.(2) Not provide the verification form as required under section 2403-C or make a false statement or misrepresentation with respect to completing the form.Section 2405-C. Enforcement and sanctions.(a) General rule.--The department shall enforce this 20250HB0610PN0623 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article.(b) Investigation of complaints.--The department shall accept, review and investigate in a timely manner any credible complaint that a public [works] contractor or subcontractor has violated a provision of this article.(c) Audits.--To ensure compliance with the requirements of this article, the department shall conduct complaint-based and random audits of public [works] contractors and subcontractors in this Commonwealth.(d) Reimbursement of department.--(1) The department may require a public [works] contractor or subcontractor to reimburse the department for the cost of an audit if the public [works] contractor or subcontractor:(i) is debarred from [public] work under a contract under subsection (e); or(ii) is subject to a civil penalty under subsection (f).(2) The cost of an audit shall be reasonably based on the amount of staff time spent on conducting an individual audit.(e) Sanctions.--The following sanctions shall apply only to a violation under section 2404-C(1):(1) For a first violation, a public [works] contractor or subcontractor shall receive a warning letter from the department detailing the violation. The letter shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) For a second violation, a public [works] contractor or subcontractor shall be debarred from [public] work under a 20250HB0610PN0623 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contract for 60 days.(3) For a third violation and subsequent violations, a public [works] contractor or subcontractor shall be debarred from [public] work under a contract for not less than one year and not more than two years.(4) In the case of an alleged willful violation, the secretary shall file a petition in Commonwealth Court seeking to have the court issue a rule to show cause why a public [works] contractor or subcontractor did not engage in the willful violation. If the court finds that the public [works] contractor or subcontractor engaged in a willful violation, the court shall order that the public [works] contractor or subcontractor be debarred from [public] work under a contract for a period of three years.(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), (2) or (3), a violation by a public [works] contractor or subcontractor that occurs 10 or more years after a prior violation shall be deemed to be a first violation.(6) For the purposes of assessing sanctions, violations committed by a contractor or subcontractor subject to this article involving a single [public works] contract shall be considered a single violation despite the number of employees that are the subject of the violations.(f) Civil penalty and sanctions.--The following shall apply:(1) A public [works] contractor or subcontractor that violates section 2404-C(2) shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $2,500 and not more than $25,000 for each violation, to be imposed by the department based on the duration and severity of the violation.(2) In addition to the penalty under paragraph (1), in 20250HB0610PN0623 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the event of a willful violation of section 2404-C(2), a public [works] contractor or subcontractor shall be subject to debarment for not less than 60 days nor more than three years, depending on the duration and severity of the violation.(g) Notice and appeal.--Actions taken by the department under subsections (e)(1), (2) and (3) and (f) shall be subject to the notice, appeal and other provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).Section 2406-C. Public [Works] Contractor Employment Verification Account.(a) Establishment.--The Public [Works] Contractor Employment Verification Account is established as a restricted revenue, interest-bearing account in the General Fund.* * *Section 2407-C. Protection from retaliation.(a) General rule.--It shall be unlawful for a public [works] contractor or subcontractor to discharge, threaten or otherwise retaliate or discriminate against an employee regarding compensation or other terms or conditions of employment because the employee:(1) participates in an investigation, hearing or inquiry held by the secretary or any other governmental authority under this article; or(2) reports or makes a complaint regarding the violation of this article to a public [works] contractor or subcontractor or to any governmental authority.* * *Section 2408-C. Good faith immunity.A public [works] contractor or subcontractor that relies in 20250HB0610PN0623 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 good faith on EVP procedures to verify employment eligibility of new employees under this article shall be immune from the sanctions authorized under section 2405-C and shall have no liability to an individual who is not hired or who is discharged from employment in the event that incorrect information has been provided to the public [works] contractor or subcontractor. A public [works] contractor or subcontractor that can produce written acknowledgment provided by an applicable Federal agency of use of EVP is considered to have acted in good faith.Section 2409-C. Public [works] contractor and subcontractor liability.Nothing in this article may be construed to render a public [works] contractor liable for the action of a subcontractor or a subcontractor liable for an action of another subcontractor.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0610PN0623 - 9 - 123456789101112131415